Maryland, session 2026, HB0196.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Health – General
21–330.4.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) (i) “Baby food” means food packaged in a jar, pouch, tub, or box sold
specifically for babies and children under the age of 2 years.
(ii) “Baby food” [does not include infant] INCLUDES:
1. INFANT formula, as defined in 21 U.S.C. § 321(z); AND
2. INFANT CEREAL, AS DEFINED IN 7 C.F.R. § 220.2.
INFANT CEREAL.
(III) “BABY FOOD” DOES NOT INCLUDE INFANT FORMULA, AS
DEFINED IN 21 U.S.C. § 321(Z).
(3) “CERTIFICATE OF ANALYSIS” MEANS A WRITTEN REPORT, WHICH
MAY BE IN ELECTRONIC FORM, ISSUED BY A LABORATORY ACCREDITED UNDER THE
STANDARDS OF THE INTERNATIONAL ORGANIZATION FOR
STANDARDIZATION/INTERNATIONAL ELECTROTECHNICAL COMMISSION THAT
IDENTIFIES:
(I) THE PRODUCTION LOT TESTED;
(II) THE ANALYTICAL METHODS USED; AND
(III) THE MEASURED CONCENTRATION OF EACH REGULATED
ELEMENT IN PARTS PER BILLION.
(4) (I) “INFANT CEREAL” MEANS A CEREAL–BASED FOOD
PRODUCT THAT IS:
1. SPECIFICALLY MANUFACTURED FOR CONSUMPTION
BY CHILDREN UNDER THE AGE OF 12 MONTHS;

HOUSE BILL 196 3
2. LABELED, MARKETED, OR OTHERWISE REPRESENTED
AS SUITABLE FOR INFANT FEEDING, INCLUDING THROUGH PACKAGING,
ADVERTISING, OR INSTRUCTIONS INDICATING USE FOR INFANTS; AND
3. TYPICALLY PREPARED BY MIXING WITH BREAST
MILK, INFANT FORMULA, OR WATER TO FORM A SOFT OR SEMI–LIQUID CONSISTENCY
APPROPRIATE FOR INFANTS.
(II) “INFANT CEREAL” INCLUDES RICE CEREAL, OAT CEREAL,
MULTIGRAIN CEREAL, OR OTHER GRAIN–BASED CEREALS MARKETED FOR INFANTS
UNDER THE AGE OF 12 MONTHS.
(III) “INFANT CEREAL” DOES NOT INCLUDE GRAIN–BASED
BREAKFAST CEREALS INTENDED FOR CONSUMPTION BY CHILDREN AT LEAST 12
MONTHS OLD OR BY ADULTS.
(3) (5) “Manufacturer” includes a food manufacturer, food processor,
and food packer.
(4) (6) “Production aggregate” means a quantity of product that is
intended to have uniform composition, character, and quality and is produced according to
a master manufacturing order.
(5) (7) “Proficient laboratory” means a laboratory that:
(i) Is accredited under the standards of the International
Organization for Standardization/International Electrotechnical Commission 17025:2017;
(ii) Uses an analytical method at least as sensitive as the analytical
method described in Section 4.7 of the U.S. Food and Drug Administration Elemental
Analysis Manual for Food and Related Products; and
(iii) Demonstrates proficiency in quantifying each toxic element to at
least 6 micrograms of the toxic element to kilogram of food through an independent
proficiency test by achieving a z–score that is less than or equal to plus or minus two; AND
(IV) IS CAPABLE OF PERFORMING VALIDATED TRACE–ELEMENT
ANALYTICAL TESTING.
(6) (8) “QR code” means a machine–readable code, consisting of an
array of squares, used for storing an Internet website in order to access a webpage.
(7) (9) “Representative sample” means a sample that consists of a
number of units that are drawn based on rational criteria, such as random sampling, and
intended to ensure that the sample accurately portrays the material being sampled.

HOUSE BILL 196
(8) (10) “Toxic heavy metal ELEMENT” means arsenic, cadmium, lead, or
mercury.
(b) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2) of this subsection, on or after
January 1, 2025, a person may not sell, distribute, or offer for sale baby food in the State
that contains toxic heavy metals ELEMENTS that exceed the limits established by the U.S.
Food and Drug Administration.
(2) A person may sell, distribute, or offer for sale baby food INFANT
CEREAL manufactured before January 1, 2026 APRIL 1, 2028.
(c) (1) Beginning January 1, 2025, each manufacturer of baby food shall test
a representative sample of each production aggregate of the manufacturer’s final baby food
product for each toxic heavy metal ELEMENT.
(2) The testing required under paragraph (1) of this subsection shall be
conducted by a proficient laboratory at least once per month.
(3) A manufacturer may test the final baby food product in accordance with
paragraph (1) of this subsection before packaging individual units of baby food for sale or
distribution.
(d) On the request of the Department, a manufacturer of baby food shall provide
the results of the testing conducted under subsection (c) of this section to an authorized
agent of the Department.
(e) Beginning January 1, 2026, each EACH manufacturer of baby food shall:
(1) Make BEGINNING JANUARY 1, 2026, MAKE THE FOLLOWING
INFORMATION publicly available on the manufacturer’s website for each baby food product
sold, manufactured, delivered, held, or offered for sale in the State WITHOUT REQUIRING
THE PROVISION OF A UPC NUMBER, A LOT NUMBER, OR A PROOF OF PURCHASE:
(i) The name and level of each toxic heavy metal ELEMENT present
in the final baby food product as determined by the testing conducted under subsection (c)
of this section;
(ii) Sufficient information, such as the product name, universal
product code, or lot or batch number, to enable consumers to identify the final baby food
product; and
(iii) A link to the U.S. Food and Drug Administration’s website that
includes the most recent U.S. Food and Drug Administration guidance and information
about the health effects of the toxic heavy metals ELEMENTS on children; and

HOUSE BILL 196 5
(2) If the baby food is tested for a toxic heavy metal ELEMENT subject to
an action level, regulatory limit, or tolerance established by the U.S. Food and Drug
Administration under 21 C.F.R. § 109, include on the baby food product label:
(i) The following statement: “For information about toxic element
testing on this product, scan the QR code.”; and
(ii) A QR code or other machine–readable code that allows
consumers to access on the manufacturer’s website or the baby food product information
page:
1. The test results for the toxic heavy metals; and
2. A link to the webpage on the U.S. Food and Drug
Administration website that includes the most recent guidance and information about the
health effects of the toxic heavy metal ELEMENT on children;
(3) INCLUDE THE INFORMATION REQUIRED UNDER ITEM (2) OF THIS
SUBSECTION:
(I) FOR BABY FOOD THAT IS NOT INFANT CEREAL, BEGINNING
JANUARY 1, 2026; AND
(II) FOR INFANT CEREAL, BEGINNING JANUARY 1, 2028;
(4) IF THE BABY FOOD IS SOLD ONLINE OR DIRECTLY TO CONSUMERS
IN THE STATE AND SHIPPED TO CONSUMERS IN THE STATE ON OR AFTER JANUARY
1, 2027, INCLUDE ON THE PRODUCT DETAILS PAGE OF EACH INTERNET WEBSITE
WHERE THE BABY FOOD IS SOLD THE FOLLOWING STATEMENT: “FOR INFORMATION
ABOUT TOXIC ELEMENT TESTING ON THIS PRODUCT, VISIT (INSERT THE LINK TO THE
PAGE ON WHICH THE INFORMATION REQUIRED UNDER ITEM (1) OF THIS
SUBSECTION IS POSTED)”; AND
(5) BEGINNING APRIL 1, 2028, RETAIN EACH CERTIFICATE OF
ANALYSIS FOR BABY FOOD TESTED UNDER THIS SECTION FOR AT LEAST 5 YEARS.
(f) If a consumer believes, based on information gathered through the use of the
code included on the baby food product label under subsection (e)(2) (E)(2)(II) of this
section, that baby food is being sold in the State with toxic heavy metals ELEMENTS that
exceed limits established by the U.S. Food and Drug Administration, the consumer shall
report the baby food to the Department.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.